Utah statutes.
10-3-1308.   Investment creating conflict of interest with duties -- Disclosure.

Any personal interest or investment by a municipal employee or by any elected or appointed official of a municipality which creates a conflict between the employee's or official's personal interests and his public duties shall be disclosed in open meeting to the members of the body in the manner required by Section 10-3-1306.



Amended by Chapter 147, 1989 General Session

